Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Chapter 12. First-Time Home Buyer Savings Plan Act.

§ 36-171.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Account holder”
means an individual who establishes, individually or jointly with one or more other individuals, an account with a financial institution for which the account holder claims a first-time home buyer savings account status on his Virginia income tax return.

“Allowable closing costs”
means a disbursement listed on a settlement statement for the purchase of a single-family residence in the Commonwealth by a qualified beneficiary.

“Eligible costs”
means the down payment and allowable closing costs for the purchase of a single-family residence in the Commonwealth by a qualified beneficiary.

“Financial institution”
means any bank, trust company, savings institution, industrial loan association, consumer finance company, or credit union or any benefit association, insurance company, safe deposit company, money market mutual fund, or similar entity authorized to do business in the Commonwealth.

“First-time home buyer savings account”
or

“account”

means an account with a financial institution for which the account holder claims first-time home buyer savings account status on his Virginia income tax return for taxable year 2014 or any taxable year thereafter, pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of paying or reimbursing eligible costs for the purchase of a single-family residence in the Commonwealth by a qualified beneficiary. Financial institutions shall not be required to (i) designate an account as a first-time home buyer savings account, or designate the beneficiaries of such accounts, in the financial institutions’ account contracts or systems or in any other way; (ii) track the use of funds withdrawn from such accounts; (iii) allocate funds in such accounts among joint account owners or multiple beneficiaries; or (iv) report any of the information stated in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) to the Department of Taxation or other governmental agency. Financial institutions shall not be responsible for or liable for (a) determining or ensuring that an account satisfies the requirements to be a first-time home buyer savings account, (b) determining or ensuring that costs are eligible costs, or (c) reporting or remitting taxes or penalties for such accounts.

“Qualified beneficiary”
means only an individual who resides in the Commonwealth at the time of settlement on the purchase of a single-family residence in the Commonwealth who (i) has never owned or purchased under contract for deed, either individually or jointly, a single-family residence in the Commonwealth or outside of the Commonwealth; (ii) is designated as the beneficiary of an account designated by the account holder as a first-time home buyer savings account; and (iii) may apply moneys or funds held in such account for eligible costs. A qualified beneficiary may use the funds from such account for eligible costs regardless of whether such qualified beneficiary purchases the single-family residence as sole owner or jointly with another individual.

“Settlement statement”
means the statement of receipts and disbursements for a transaction related to real estate, including a statement prescribed under the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974 (RESPA), 12 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq., as amended, and the regulations thereunder, or an executed sales agreement for the purchase of a manufactured home being conveyed as personal property.

“Single-family residence”
means a single-family residence owned and occupied by a qualified beneficiary, including a manufactured home, trailer, mobile home, condominium unit, or cooperative.

History.

2014, c. 729, § 55-555; 2019, c. 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 712 recodified Chapter 32 of Title 55 as this chapter, effective October 1, 2019. Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.
Acts 2019, c. 712, codified former § 55-555 as this section.

Acts 2019, c. 712, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2019.”

§ 36-172.
Claiming first-time home buyer status.

The account holder shall be responsible for the use or application of moneys or funds in an account for which the account holder claims first-time home buyer savings account status.

The account holder shall (i) not use moneys or funds held in an account to pay expenses of administering the account, except that a service fee may be deducted from the account by a financial institution; (ii) maintain documentation, which may include the settlement statement, of the segregation of moneys or funds in separate accounts and documentation of eligible costs for the purchase of a single-family residence in the Commonwealth; (iii) file, with the account holder’s Virginia income tax return, forms developed by the Department of Taxation regarding treatment of the account as a first-time home buyer savings account under this chapter, along with the Form 1099 issued by the financial institution for such account; and (iv) remit to the Department of Taxation the tax on any amounts (a) added to individual income pursuant to subdivision 6 of §

58.1-322.01

or (b) recaptured pursuant to subdivision 25 of §

58.1-322.02

.

The Tax Commissioner shall develop guidelines applicable to account holders to implement the provisions of this chapter. Such guidelines shall be exempt from the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). Such guidelines shall not apply to, or impose administrative, reporting, or other obligations or requirements on, financial institutions-related accounts for which first-time home buyer savings account status is claimed by the account holder.

History.

2014, c. 729, § 55-556; 2017, c. 444; 2019, c. 712.

Editor’s note.

Former § 55-556 was codified as this section by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019.

Effective date.

This chapter is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 36-173.
Tax exemption; conditions.

All interest or other income earned attributable to an account shall be excluded from the Virginia taxable income of the account holder as provided under subdivision 25 of §

58.1-322.02

.

There shall be an aggregate limit of $50,000 per account on the amount of principal for which the account holder may claim first-time home buyer savings account status. Only cash and marketable securities may be contributed to an account.

Subject to the aggregate limit on the amount of principal that may be contributed to an account pursuant to subsection B, there shall be a limitation of $150,000 on the amount of principal and interest or other income on the principal that may be retained within an account.

An account holder shall be subject to Virginia income tax pursuant to subdivision 6 of §

58.1-322.01

to the extent of any loss deducted as a capital loss by the individual for federal income tax purposes attributable to the person’s account.

Upon being furnished proof of the death of the account holder, a financial institution shall distribute the principal and accumulated interest or other income in the account in accordance with the terms of the contract governing the account.

History.

2014, c. 729, § 55-557; 2017, c. 444; 2019, c. 712.

Editor’s note.

Former § 55-557 was codified as this section by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019.

Effective date.

This chapter is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 36-174.
Withdrawal of funds from account for purposes other than eligible costs for first-time home purchase.

If moneys or funds are withdrawn from an account for any purpose other than the payment of eligible costs by or on behalf of a qualified beneficiary, there shall be imposed a penalty calculated using the Form 1099 showing the amount of income exempted from state income tax, and a five percent penalty shall be assessed on the amount of exempted income. The penalty shall be paid to the Department of Taxation. In addition, as provided under subdivision 25 of §

58.1-322.02

, the account holder shall also be subject to recapture of income that was subtracted pursuant to that subdivision.

Such five percent penalty shall not apply to, and there shall be no recapture of income with regard to, the extent of moneys or funds withdrawn that were (i) withdrawn by reason of the qualified beneficiary’s death or disability; (ii) a disbursement of assets of the account pursuant to a filing for protection under the United States Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C. §§ 101 through 1330; or (iii) transferred from an account established pursuant to this chapter into another account established pursuant to this chapter for the benefit of another qualified beneficiary.

History.

2014, c. 729, § 55-558; 2017, c. 444; 2019, c. 712.

Editor’s note.

Former § 55-558 was codified as this section by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019.

Effective date.

This chapter is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 36-175.
False claims prohibited; penalty.

A person who knowingly prepares or causes to be prepared a false claim, receipt, statement, or billing to avoid or evade taxes or penalties upon the withdrawal of money or funds from an account for which the account holder claims first-time home buyer savings account status is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

2014, c. 729, § 55-559; 2019, c. 712.

Editor’s note.

Former § 55-559 was codified as this section by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019.

Effective date.

This chapter is effective October 1, 2019.